Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1811
Offense; proof of conviction; how treated.

If a person has been convicted of an offense on which a claim under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act is based, proof of that conviction shall be taken as conclusive evidence that the offense occurred and that such person committed the offense, unless an appeal or a proceeding with regard to it is pending.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 11;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 12.